Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Statewide Enhanced 911 Service

7-86-301. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that the “Emergency Communications District Law” has been successfully embraced by the vast majority of Tennessee counties, most of which have already initiated basic or enhanced 911 service and are developing or maintaining this lifesaving service in furtherance of the purposes stated in the law. The general assembly also finds that the establishment of emergency communications services for all citizens of the state will promote the public interest. The general assembly further finds that statewide wireless enhanced 911 service is in the public interest.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 1.

7-86-302. Emergency communication board established — Members — Terms of office — Officers — Meetings.

There is created in the department of commerce and insurance an emergency communications board, referred to in this part as “the board”, for the purpose of assisting emergency communications district boards of directors in the areas of management, operations, and accountability, and establishing emergency communications for all citizens of this state. The board shall, upon being constituted, exercise its powers and duties in accordance with this part, relative to all emergency communications districts established pursuant to this chapter or by any public or private act.

The board shall be composed of nine (9) members, as follows:

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The appointment of the comptroller's designee to the board shall be for the term of office of the comptroller;

One (1) member, appointed by the governor, who has no connection to emergency communications districts and who does not fulfill any other requirements for appointment to the board;

One (1) representative of county government, appointed by the speaker of the senate;

One (1) representative of city government, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

Three (3) members, appointed by the governor, each of whom shall be either a current director of an emergency communications district or a current member of an emergency communications district board of directors at the time of their appointment. The members appointed pursuant to this subdivision (b)(1)(E) shall each reside in a separate grand division of the state;

One (1) at large member appointed by the speaker of the senate, who at the time of the member's appointment is either a current director of an emergency communications district or a current member of an emergency communications district board of directors; and

One (1) at large member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who at the time of the member's appointment is either a current director of an emergency communications district or a current member of an emergency communications district board of directors.

No more than one (1) member appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)(E)-(G) shall be from the same county.

In appointing members to the board, the appointing authorities shall strive to ensure that the composition of the board represents:

The diversity of persons in Tennessee by considering race, gender, age, and geographical and political interests;

Emergency communication districts in urban and rural areas of the state; and

Emergency communication districts that employ both E-911 operators and dispatchers.

The governor shall appoint a successor to the member who has no connection to emergency communications districts following the expiration of that member's term on June 30, 2016, in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(B).

The speaker of the senate shall appoint a successor to the member who represents county government following the expiration of that member's term on June 30, 2018, in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(C).

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint a successor to the member who represents city government following the expiration of that member's term on June 30, 2017, in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(D).

The governor shall appoint successors to the three (3) members who represent emergency communication districts following the expiration of those members' terms on June 30, 2018, in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(E).

The speaker of the senate shall appoint a successor to the member who represents an emergency communications district following the expiration of that member's term on June 30, 2016, in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(F).

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint a successor to the member who represents an emergency communications district following the expiration of that member's term on June 30, 2017, in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(G).

Members appointed in accordance with subsection (c) shall serve three-year terms, to begin on July 1 and terminate on June 30, three (3) years thereafter.

Members shall be selected to serve on the board for no more than two (2) successive terms.

The board shall elect a chair and other officers as it may deem necessary and appropriate. The officers shall be elected for two-year terms.

The board shall meet quarterly, and at the call of the chair.

A quorum shall consist of five (5) or more members; and all official action of the board shall require a quorum.

Any member of the board who fails to attend at least fifty percent (50%) of the regularly scheduled meetings of the board within any twelve-month period shall automatically be removed from the board and a successor member shall be appointed by the appointing authority to serve out the remaining term of the member being replaced.

Subdivision (i)(1) shall not apply to meetings held in accordance with § 7-86-314(a).

All meetings of the board shall be subject to the open meeting provisions of title 8, chapter 44, and the public records provisions of title 10, chapter 7.

The executive director shall compile a report of the board's expenditures by item and revenue by source for the quarter prior to each board meeting, with the most recent report to be posted and prominently displayed on the board's web site each quarter.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 5; 2013, ch. 438, § 3; 2015, ch. 350, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The emergency communications board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) There is created in the department of commerce and insurance an emergency communications board, referred to in this part as ‘the board’, for the purpose of assisting emergency communications district boards of directors in the area of management, operations, and accountability, and establishing emergency communications for all citizens of the state. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the board shall, upon being constituted, exercise its powers and duties, in accordance with the provisions of this part, relative to all emergency communications districts established pursuant to this chapter or by any public or private act.“(b)(1) The board shall be composed of nine (9) members as follows: (A) One (1) member, appointed by the governor, who has no connection to emergency communications districts and who does not fulfill any other requirements for appointment to the board; (B) The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The appointment of the comptroller's designee to the board shall be for the term of office of the comptroller; (C) One (1) representative of county government, appointed by the governor, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested county services groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee County Services Association; (D) One (1) representative of city government, appointed by the governor, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested municipal groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Municipal League; and (E) (i) Five (5) members, appointed by the governor, who shall either be current directors of emergency communications districts or current members of emergency communications district boards of directors at the time of their appointment. The governor may appoint such members from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested emergency communications groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Emergency Number Association, or from a nominating resolution adopted by an emergency communications district. No more than two (2) members appointed pursuant to this subdivision (b)(5) shall be residents of the same congressional district. (ii) Nominations shall be made not less than thirty (30) days before the end of a term, and shall be filed with the governor and the board. In appointing members, the governor shall strive to ensure that the composition of the board represents the diversity of persons in Tennessee by considering race, gender, age, and geographical and political interests. (2) The governor shall consult with interested groups including, but not limited to, the organizations listed in subdivision (b)(1) to determine qualified persons to fill positions on the board.“(c) Members shall be appointed to four-year terms, except as provided in this subsection (c). Two (2) of the members appointed by the governor shall be appointed to serve an initial term of two (2) years, two (2) members shall be appointed to serve an initial term of three (3) years, and the remaining four (4) members shall be appointed for an initial term of four (4) years. The governor may select the members whose initial terms are less than four (4) years. Thereafter, such members shall be appointed and serve four-year terms. Members appointed by the governor may be appointed to successive terms.“(d) The board shall elect a chair and such other officers as it may deem necessary and appropriate. Such officers shall be elected for two-year terms.“(e) The board shall meet at least quarterly, and at the call of the chair.“(f) A quorum shall consist of five (5) or more members; and all official action of the board shall require a quorum.“(g) All meetings of the board shall be subject to the open meeting provisions of title 8, chapter 44, and the public records provisions of title 10, chapter 7.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 350, § 6. May 4, 2015.

7-86-303. Budget — Salary and expenses — Funding — Authorized disbursements.

The board's budget shall be subject to approval by the general assembly.

No member of the board is entitled to a salary for duties performed as a member of the board. Each member is entitled to reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties, in accordance with the state comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall be funded by the 911 surcharge established in § 7-86-128.

All current funds, including those funds currently in the 911 Emergency Communications Fund, funds collected by the board in future, and interest accrued on these funds shall be deposited in the state treasury in a separate interest-bearing fund to be known as the 911 Emergency Communications Fund. Disbursements from this fund shall be limited solely to the operational and administrative expenses of the board and the purposes as expressed in this part 3. At no time during its existence shall the 911 Emergency Communications Fund, or earnings derived thereof, be used to fund the general expenses of the state, except as authorized by this section. All interest or earnings derived from the fund shall be transferred to the fund when earned, and may be allocated by the board, in accordance with this chapter.

In order to maintain adequate 911 funding provided to emergency communications districts, the board shall annually distribute to each emergency communications district a base amount equal to the average of total recurring annual revenue the district received from distributions from the board and from direct remittance of 911 surcharges for fiscal years 2010, 2011, and 2012; however, in no event shall such distribution be less than the amount the district received in fiscal year 2012. On or before December 1, 2014, the board shall publish on its web site the base amount for each emergency communications district. The board may not reduce the base amount for any emergency communications district unless the local government funding for such emergency communications district is reduced, in which case the board may reduce the base amount by the same amount as the local funding reduction. Any emergency communication district established after January 1, 2015, shall be entitled to receive a base amount from the board in an amount determined by the board. Disbursal of the base amount to emergency communications districts shall be conducted in the following manner:

The board shall distribute one-sixth (1/6) of the base amount for each emergency communications district every two (2) months, beginning at the end of the second month of each fiscal year; and

Any emergency communications district with a locally established 911 surcharge in effect as of July 1, 2011, less than the maximum allowable surcharge then in effect shall be eligible to apply to the board for an increase in the base amount. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate such a request and to set minimum criteria that the emergency communication district must satisfy to obtain increased funding. The board shall not be obligated to increase the base amount if the board lacks sufficient funds or if the board, after reviewing its criteria as set out in its rules, finds the emergency communication district has not met the guidelines.

The board's operational expenses shall include the implementation and maintenance of an IP-based next generation 911 network and any future 911 system advancements the board deems necessary; provided, that the board shall provide a report to the information systems council each year to describe any such future 911 system advancements. The board's operational expenses shall also include funding to the Tennessee public utility commission for the Tennessee relay services/telecommunications devices access program (TRS/TDAP), which provides assistance to those Tennesseans whose disabilities interfere with their use of communications services and technologies. Funding provided by the board shall not exceed the total cost of the TRS /TDAP program in 2012 unless approved by the fiscal review committee.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 7; 2014, ch. 795, § 6; 2016, ch. 1047, § 5; 2017, ch. 94, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote (c) and (d) which read: “(c) The board shall be funded through a charge on all commercial mobile radio service, established pursuant to §7-86-108.“(d) Any funds collected by the board shall be deposited in the state treasury in a separate interest-bearing fund to be known as the 911 Emergency Communications Fund. Disbursements from this fund shall be limited solely to the operational and administrative expenses of the board and the purposes as expressed in this part. At no time during its existence shall the 911 Emergency Communications Fund be used to fund the general expenses of the state of Tennessee.“(1) The board shall distribute twenty-five percent (25%) of the revenue generated by such a charge to each emergency communications district created either pursuant to §7-86-105 or this part, based on the proportion of the population of each district to that of the state, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Such funds shall be used at the discretion of each district for the provision of 911 service in accordance with this chapter. Such distribution shall be made thereafter as soon as possible in accordance with this part.“(2) The board shall also use such funds to reimburse emergency communications districts and commercial radio service providers for expenditures to implement, maintain, operate, or enhance statewide wireless enhanced 911 service, in accordance with §7-86-306(a)(11).“(3)(A) Any funds collected in excess of the annual fiscal requirements of the board, which shall include the payments to emergency communications districts established in subdivision (d)(1), shall not revert to the general fund. Any unspent funds at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used as a beginning balance for the fiscal requirements for such fiscal year. The board may, at its discretion, and following policies, procedures, and criteria the board has developed, use any such unspent funds to provide grants for operating and capital expenditures for basic or enhanced 911 service and wireless enhanced 911 service to assist emergency communications districts created either pursuant to §7-86-105 or this part. Such grants may be renewed by the board:“AFTER providing for all necessary and reasonable operating and administrative expenses of the board, which shall include the payments and grants established in this section;“AND AFTER implementing statewide wireless enhanced 911 service pursuant to standards established by the board, which shall include the present and future costs associated with required and necessary implementation, operation, maintenance, and enhancement of statewide wireless enhanced 911 service pursuant to the federal communications commission order, in accordance with subdivision (d)(2) and §7-86-306(a)(10);“AND AFTER establishing 911 service throughout Tennessee pursuant to standards established by the board;“THEN the board may distribute any excess revenue to each emergency communications district created either pursuant to § 7-86-105 or this part, for the purposes of promoting uniform 911 service, and those purposes stated in the law and this section. The board must first determine that such distribution is possible and practicable, does not threaten the solvency of the 911 Emergency Communications Fund, and is consistent with § 7-86-306.“(B) It is the intent of the general assembly that the board should distribute such excess revenue to emergency communications districts, as long as such distribution is consistent with this section.” and added (e) and (f).

The 2016 amendment, in (d), added “, except as authorized by this section” at the end of the penultimate sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the second sentence of (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 15. January 1, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 1047, § 7. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

7-86-304. Uniform financial accounting system — Audit — Annual budgets — Supervision of financially distressed districts.

The comptroller of the treasury is directed to develop a uniform financial accounting system conforming to generally accepted accounting principles for use as required by this section. Effective July 1, 1999, each emergency communications district shall use the uniform accounting system developed by the comptroller of the treasury.

The annual audit of all emergency communications districts shall disclose the failure of any such district to maintain such a financial accounting system as prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The comptroller of the treasury shall file with the board a copy of the audited financial statements of each emergency communications district, prepared pursuant to § 7-86-113. The board shall have authority to act upon any adverse findings noted in such audits or financial statements and to order such action as may be necessary to remedy the adverse findings.

The board of directors of each emergency communications district shall file with the board a copy of its annual budget, prepared in accordance with § 7-86-120.

Any emergency communications district that is a financially distressed emergency communications district shall be subject to the supervision and evaluation of the board. A “financially distressed emergency communications district” is a district that, as shown by the annual audits:

Has a negative change in net position for a period of three (3) consecutive years;

Has a deficit in total net position; or

Is in default on any indebtedness.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), the board may determine that a district is a “financially distressed emergency communications district,” and shall be subject to the supervision and evaluation of the board, if a district:

Is the subject of a lien filed by the internal revenue service;

The board determines that it appears that the district cannot satisfy its financial obligations to the extent that the continued operation of the district is at risk; or

The district has defaulted on any indebtedness due to insufficient funds, such default is not cured within sixty (60) days and, upon determination of the board, it appears that the district cannot satisfy its financial obligations to the extent that the continued operation of the district is at risk.

After reviewing the financial statements and operations of any financially distressed emergency communications district, and after holding a public hearing within such district's service area, the board may prescribe a rate structure, up to the maximum established pursuant to former § 7-86-108(a)(2)(A) [repealed], to be adopted by the district, as may be necessary to cause the district to liquidate in an orderly fashion any deficit total net position, to cure a default on any indebtedness of the district, and to eliminate the negative change in net position, or any of these.

If the board of an emergency communications district fails to adopt the prescribed rate structure, the board may, in addition to any and all other remedial actions available to it, petition the chancery court, in a jurisdiction in which the emergency communications district is operating, to require the adoption of the rate structure prescribed by the board or such other remedial actions that, in the opinion of the court, may be required to cause the district to be operated in accordance with the provisions of state law.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 8; 2001, ch. 149, § 3; 2004, ch. 619, §§ 10-12; 2014, ch. 579, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-86-108, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 3, effective January 1, 2015.

7-86-305. Consolidation or merger for purposes of financial stability.

As a means to restore financial stability to financially distressed emergency communications districts and to ensure continued 911 service for the benefit of the public, the board may study the possible consolidation or merger of two (2) or more adjacent emergency communications districts, if at least one (1) such emergency communications district is financially distressed. In the event that the board determines that such a consolidation or merger is in the best interest of the public, and after holding public hearings within the service areas of the affected emergency communications districts, the board may order the consolidation or merger. The board shall establish rules and policies concerning the composition and selection of the board of directors, and shall establish technical and operating standards and a rate structure for such multi-jurisdictional emergency communications district; provided, that such action shall not threaten the financial integrity or stability of the affected emergency communications districts, or the level and quality of 911 service.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, a merger or consolidation affecting a non-financially distressed emergency communications district shall not become effective without the prior approval of the board of directors of such non-financially distressed emergency communications district.

For purposes of determining whether an emergency communications district is financially distressed, the board shall not consider an emergency communications district's depreciation costs as an operating expense.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 9; 2014, ch. 795, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “911 Funding Modernization and IP Transition Act of 2014”.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 15. January 1, 2015.

7-86-306. Powers and duties of board — Review of decisions or orders of board.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this part, the board has the power and authority to:

Promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the conduct of the affairs of the board;

Adopt a seal for the board, prescribe the style of the seal, and alter the seal at pleasure;

Subject to title 9, chapter 4, part 51, appoint and fix the salaries and duties of the experts, agents, and employees, and set the qualifications for such persons as it deems necessary;

Appoint an executive director, who shall be a person of good moral character and shall be professionally qualified to administer, manage, and direct the affairs and business of the board, which include, but are not limited to:

Maintaining and securing all essential records and files;

Implementing board policies and procedures;

Informing the board as to state statutes, policies, and procedures; and

Any other matters delegated by the board;

For the purposes of §§ 8-30-201 and 8-30-202, the executive director of the board shall be considered the equivalent of an assistant commissioner;

Before assuming any official duties, the executive director shall take and subscribe to the oath of office and shall execute a bond in the manner prescribed by title 8, chapter 19. This subdivision (a)(4)(C) shall not apply to the executive director serving on May 4, 2015;

Subject to title 12, make and enter into contracts and purchases;

Adopt a proposed budget, which shall be included in the proposed budget of the department of commerce and insurance;

Accept gifts, grants, or other moneys, and to receive appropriations that may be made by law;

Provide advisory technical assistance to any emergency communications district upon request;

Administer the deployment of 911 service for emerging communications technologies, including, but not limited to, IP-enabled service, that are capable of connecting users dialing or entering the digits 911 to public safety answering points and other non-wireline services;

Establish technical operating standards for emergency communications districts and periodically review and revise wireless enhanced 911 standards based on orders and rulings by the federal communications commission (FCC);

Establish operating standards concerning acceptable uses of revenue for emergency communications districts and periodically review and revise these standards;

Respond to requests from emergency communications districts, commercial mobile radio service (CMRS) providers or other parties and subject to availability of funds, review and approve requests for reimbursements for expenditures or payment of obligations incurred to implement, operate, maintain, or enhance statewide wireless enhanced 911 service in conformance with any rules or orders of the FCC, and other federal and state requirements that pertain to wireless enhanced 911 service;

Raise the emergency telephone service charge rates of an individual emergency communications district up to the maximum established in former § 7-86-108(a)(2)(A) [repealed]; provided, that the district meets financial and operational criteria established by the board in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury;

From time to time, submit to the speakers of the general assembly any recommended amendments to this chapter; and

Exercise all the powers and take all the actions necessary, proper, or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this section.

Any party adversely affected by a decision or order of the board may, within sixty (60) days of the board's action, initiate a contested case as provided by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, which shall be heard by an administrative law judge sitting alone.

In the conduct of any hearing upon request or complaint, the administrative law judge may receive evidence in the form of affidavits in addition to minutes, transcripts, and other evidence of actions by an emergency communications district.

Nothing contained within subdivision (a)(12) or this section shall be construed to authorize the board to establish CMRS rates other than a flat, statewide, uniform rate.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 10; 2004, ch. 810, § 5; 2005, ch. 147, § 1; 2006, ch. 647, § 1; 2015, ch. 350, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 810, § 1 provided the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations is directed to conduct, within existing resources, an expedited, comprehensive study of all aspects of Tennessee's emergency telephone service (911) statutes, including, but not limited to, local emergency communications districts and their respective boards, the state emergency communications board, the provision of enhanced 911 service, and the assessment of emergency telephone service charges upon telecommunications service providers and customers.

Acts 2004, ch. 810, § 2 provided that in conducting such study, the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations shall specifically examine the funding mechanisms and the adequacy of the funding for local emergency communications districts and their respective boards, as well as the state emergency communications board.

Acts 2004, ch. 810, § 3 provided that such study shall also evaluate the feasibility and necessity of:

Increasing emergency telephone service charges on telephone land lines and wireless telecommunications services; and

Revising the statutory assessment formula for funding emergency telephone services.

Acts 2004, ch. 810, § 4 provided that the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations shall complete such study relative to emergency telephone service (911) and report its findings and recommendations, including any necessary legislation, to the general assembly no later than February 1, 2006.

In light of the passage of Acts 2012, ch. 800, which rewrote the civil service provisions, “§§8-30-201 and8-30-202” was substituted for “§8-30-208” in (a)(3).

Former 7-86-108 referred to in this section was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 795, § 3, effective January 1, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(3), which read: “Subject to title 9, chapter 4, part 51 appoint and fix the salaries and duties of such experts, agents, and employees as it deems necessary. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for the purposes of §§8-30-201 and8-30-202, the executive director of the board shall be considered the equivalent of an assistant commissioner;”; added a new (a)(4) and renumbered the subsequent subdivisions accordingly.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 350, § 6. May 4, 2015.

Attorney General Opinions. Communication board may consider county's commitment to maintain funding for an emergency communications district when considering whether to approve higher rates for that district, OAG 08-193 (12/29/08).

7-86-307. Plan for providing statewide 911 and enhanced wireless 911 service.

The board shall develop and implement a plan for providing 911 service and wireless enhanced 911 service to all citizens of Tennessee. The plan shall provide for:

A schedule for the implementation, installation, operation, maintenance, and enhancement of statewide wireless enhanced 911 service, and the funding of the service;

A schedule for the implementation and coordination of a 911 system plan for the state, which shall include the funding of the plan. With respect to an emergency communications district's financial standing and the level and quality of 911 service, the board shall act as the deciding agency whenever such issues arise between an emergency communications district and other governmental units involving the 911 system;

A review and analysis of progress maintained by emergency communications districts in complying with technical, operating, and financial standards adopted by the board;

A plan for each emergency communications district not meeting technical, financial, and operating standards as established in this part by the board to come into compliance with such standards; and

An implementation schedule that accounts for the progress achieved by each district in attaining and maintaining financial, technical, and operating standards.

The board shall encourage and promote the planning, development, and implementation of 911 service for each newly created emergency communications district. Any emergency communications district newly created after May 20, 1998, shall have its 911 system plan approved by the board prior to implementation. The plan for each such district shall include specific local requirements. Such plan shall include, but not be limited to, law enforcement, firefighting, and emergency medical services and may include, but not be limited to, other emergency services such as poison control, animal control, suicide prevention, and emergency management services.

Such plan shall also include funding requirements necessary to implement and operate the 911 system; provided, that if anticipated revenues are not adequate to achieve and maintain technical and operating standards as established by the board in this part, the board shall undertake a study to determine other options for the provision of 911 service to that area.

The board shall not require the commercial mobile radio service providers to select or deploy particular commercial solutions to meet any federal communications commission rulings or orders, or other requirements concerning wireless enhanced 911 service; provided, that the solutions chosen are compatible with the operations of emergency communications districts and the technical and operating standards for wireless enhanced 911 service adopted by the board.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 11.

7-86-308. Technical advisory committee.

The board shall appoint a technical advisory committee, the number of members to be determined by the board. The technical advisory committee shall be composed of representatives of 911 service suppliers and non-wireline service providers, including, but not limited to, commercial mobile radio service and IP-enabled service providers, for the purpose of providing and receiving operational and technical information and advice on all aspects of wireless enhanced 911 service. The technical advisory committee members shall not be voting members of the board. No member of this committee is entitled to a salary for duties performed as a member of the committee. No member is entitled to reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 12; 2007, ch. 380, § 1.

7-86-309. Other advisory committees.

The board shall appoint advisory committees for the purpose of providing and receiving information to the board; the number of members on such committees shall be determined by the board. Such committees may include, but not be limited to, local government officials, consumers, 911 service users, law enforcement personnel, firefighting personnel, and emergency medical services personnel. Members of such advisory committees shall not be voting members of the board. No member of any such advisory committee is entitled to a salary for duties performed as a committee member. No member is entitled to reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 13.

7-86-310. Board approval required for approval of new district within existing district.

After May 20, 1998, no referendum to allow the creation of a new emergency communications district within the boundaries of an existing emergency communications district shall take place without prior approval by the board. In the event that the board determines that such a creation is in the best interest of the public, and after holding a public hearing within the service area of the existing emergency communications district, the board may order that a referendum be held; provided, that such action shall not threaten the financial integrity or stability or the level or quality of 911 service of the existing emergency communications district.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 14.

7-86-311. Referendum to create countywide districts — Plan to provide service to counties that fail to approve referendum.

In each county in which an emergency communications district has not been created by January 1, 2000, the board shall order an election to be held at the next regularly scheduled general election, pursuant to § 2-3-204, to submit to the voters of the county the question of creating a countywide emergency communications district. In the election to be held, the questions submitted to the qualified voters shall be “For the Emergency Communications District,” or “Against the Emergency Communications District.” Upon approval by a majority of those voting, an emergency communications district is created in accordance with title 7, chapter 86.

In the event that such a referendum is not approved by a majority of those voting, the board shall be authorized to develop and implement a plan for the provision of wireless enhanced 911 service to such county.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 15.

7-86-312. Request for board review of district decision.

Any city or county governing body may, by resolution, request the board to review a decision of the board of directors of the emergency communications district serving such city or county affecting its financial standing and its level or quality of 911 service.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 16.

7-86-313. Request for board review of district financial statements — Petition by board to require district to adopt temporary rate structure.

Any county or city governing body may, by resolution, request the board to review the financial statements of an emergency communications district serving such county or city. If the board determines that such district is accumulating excess reserves or retained earnings, and if such emergency communications district is not able to justify such accumulation of revenues, the board may petition the chancery court in a jurisdiction in which such emergency communications district is operating, to require the adoption of a temporary rate structure recommended by the board, or other temporary rate structure sufficient to reduce such excess retained earnings; provided, that any such rate ordered by the chancery court must be adequate to cover all reasonable and necessary costs of operation, and shall not threaten the financial integrity of such emergency communications district or its quality and level of 911 service.

Acts 1998, ch. 1108, § 17.